District of Columbia statutes.
23-533

Rules.

The Chief of Police, in consultation with the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia and the Corporation Counsel, shall promulgate regulations to implement this subchapter within 60 days of the effective date of this act [October 4, 2000].

History

October 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 402, 47 DCR 4619